Washington statutes.
RCW 43.70.081

Transfer of certain behavioral health-related powers, duties, and functions from the department of social and health services.

(1) The powers, duties, and functions of the department of social and health services pertaining to licensing and certification of behavioral health provider agencies and facilities, except for state-run mental health institutions, are hereby transferred to the department of health to the extent necessary to carry out the purposes of chapter 201, Laws of 2018. All references to the secretary or the department of social and health services in the Revised Code of Washington shall be construed to mean the secretary of the department of health or the department of health when referring to the functions transferred in this section.

(2)(a) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files, papers, or written material in the possession of the department of social and health services pertaining to the powers, duties, and functions transferred shall be delivered to the custody of the department of health. All cabinets, furniture, office equipment, motor vehicles, and other tangible property employed by the department of social and health services in carrying out the powers, duties, and functions transferred shall be made available to the department of health. All funds, credits, or other assets held by the department of social and health services in connection with the powers, duties, and functions transferred shall be assigned to the department of health.

(b) Any appropriations made to the department of social and health services for carrying out the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall, on July 1, 2018, be transferred and credited to the department of health.

(c) If any question arises as to the transfer of any personnel, funds, books, documents, records, papers, files, equipment, or other tangible property used or held in the exercise of the powers and the performance of the duties and functions transferred, the director of financial management shall make a determination as to the proper allocation and certify the same to the state agencies concerned.

(3) All rules and all pending business before the department of social and health services pertaining to the powers, duties, and functions transferred shall be continued and acted upon by the department of health. All existing contracts and obligations shall remain in full force and shall be performed by the department of health.

(4) The transfer of the powers, duties, functions, and personnel of the department of social and health services shall not affect the validity of any act performed before July 1, 2018.

(5) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the transfers directed by this section, the director of financial management shall certify the apportionments to the agencies affected, the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of these shall make the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and appropriation accounts and equipment records in accordance with the certification.

(6) On July 1, 2018, all employees of the department of social and health services engaged in performing the powers, functions, and duties transferred to the department of health are transferred to the department of health. All employees classified under chapter 41.06 RCW, the state civil service law, are assigned to the department of health to perform their usual duties upon the same terms as formerly, without any loss of rights, subject to any action that may be appropriate thereafter in accordance with the laws and rules governing state civil service law.

(7) Positions in any bargaining unit within the department of health existing on July 1, 2018, will not be removed from an existing bargaining unit as a result of this section unless and until the existing bargaining unit is modified by the public employment relations commission pursuant to Title 391 WAC. Nonsupervisory civil service employees of the department of social and health services assigned to the department of health under this section whose positions are within the existing bargaining unit description at the department of health shall become a part of that unit under the provision of chapter 41.80 RCW. The existing bargaining representative of the existing bargaining unit at the department of health shall continue to be certified as the exclusive bargaining representative without the necessity of an election.

(8) The department of health may enter into agreements as necessary with the department of social and health services to carry out the transfer of duties as set forth in chapter 201, Laws of 2018.

[ 2018 c 201 s 10002.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—Effective date—2018 c 201: See notes following RCW 41.05.018.